Yamls/Pron-kin_gt-norm.yaml
    кин-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: киннэз-либо
    кин-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: киннэзӧс-либо
    кин-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: киннэзлӧн-либо
    кин-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Abl: киннэзлісь-либо
    кин-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Dat: киннэзлӧ-либо
    кин-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ins: киннэзӧн-либо 
    кин-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: киннэзкӧт-либо
    кин-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Car: киннэзтӧг-либо
    кин-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cns: киннэзла-либо
    кин-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cmpr: киннэзся-либо
    кин-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: киннэзын-либо
    кин-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: киннэзісь-либо
    кин-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: киннэзӧ-либо
    кин-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Apr: киннэзлань-либо
    кин-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Egr: киннэзсянь-либо
    кин-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Prl: киннэзӧт-либо
    кин-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerI: киннэзӧдз-либо
    кин-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerII: киннэзви-либо
    кин-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIne: киннэзланьын-либо
    кин-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEla: киннэзланись-либо
    кин-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIll: киннэзланьӧ-либо
    кин-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEgr: киннэзланьсянь-либо
    кин-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprPrl: киннэзланьӧт-либо
    кин-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerI: киннэзланьӧдз-либо
    кин-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerII: киннэзланьви-либо

Pronoun – мый-либо: # Indefinite Pronoun 'Jokin / что-либо'
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: мый-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: мый-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: мыйлӧн-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl: мыйлісь-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Sg+Dat: мыйлӧ-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ins: мыйӧн-либо 
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: мыйкӧт-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Sg+Car: мыйтӧг-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cns: мыйла-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cmpr: мыйся-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine: мыйын-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela: мыйись-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: мыйӧ-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Sg+Apr: мыйлань-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Sg+Egr: мыйсянь-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Sg+Prl: мыйӧт-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerI: мыйӧдз-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerII: мыйви-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIne: мыйланьын-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEla: мыйланись-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIll: мыйланьӧ-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEgr: мыйланьсянь-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprPrl: мыйланьӧт-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerI: мыйланьӧдз-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerII: мыйланьви-либо

    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: мыйез-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: мыйез-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: мыйезлӧн-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Abl: мыйезлісь-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Dat: мыйезлӧ-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ins: мыйезӧн-либо 
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: мыйезкӧт-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Car: мыйезтӧг-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cns: мыйезла-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cmpr: мыйезся-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: мыйезын-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: мыйезісь-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: мыйезӧ-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Apr: мыйезлань-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Egr: мыйезсянь-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+Prl: мыйезӧт-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerI: мыйезӧдз-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerII: мыйезви-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIne: мыйезланьын-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEla: мыйезланись-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIll: мыйезланьӧ-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEgr: мыйезланьсянь-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprPrl: мыйезланьӧт-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerI: мыйезланьӧдз-либо
    мый-либо+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerII: мыйезланьви-либо

##Pronoun – кин-нибудь: # Indefinite Pronoun 'Joku / Кто-нибудь'
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: кин-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: кинӧс-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: кинлӧн-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl: кинлісь-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Dat: кинлӧ-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ins: кинӧн-нибудь 
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: кинкӧт-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Car: кинтӧг-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cns: кинла-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cmpr: кинся-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine: кинын-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela: кинісь-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: кинӧ-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Apr: кинлань-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Egr: кинсянь-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Prl: кинӧт-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerI: кинӧдз-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerII: кинви-нибудь 
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIne: кинланьын-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEla: кинланись-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIll: кинланьӧ-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEgr: кинланьсянь-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprPrl: кинланьӧт-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerI: кинланьӧдз-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerII: кинланьви-нибудь

    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: киннэз-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: киннэзӧс-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: киннэзлӧн-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Abl: киннэзлісь-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Dat: киннэзлӧ-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ins: киннэзӧн-нибудь 
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: киннэзкӧт-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Car: киннэзтӧг-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cns: киннэзла-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cmpr: киннэзся-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: киннэзын-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: киннэзісь-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: киннэзӧ-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Apr: киннэзлань-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Egr: киннэзсянь-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Prl: киннэзӧт-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerI: киннэзӧдз-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerII: киннэзви-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIne: киннэзланьын-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEla: киннэзланись-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIll: киннэзланьӧ-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEgr: киннэзланьсянь-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprPrl: киннэзланьӧт-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerI: киннэзланьӧдз-нибудь
    кин-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerII: киннэзланьви-нибудь

Pronoun – мый-нибудь: # Indefinite Pronoun 'Jokin / что-нибудь'
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: мый-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: мый-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: мыйлӧн-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl: мыйлісь-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Dat: мыйлӧ-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ins: мыйӧн-нибудь 
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: мыйкӧт-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Car: мыйтӧг-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cns: мыйла-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cmpr: мыйся-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine: мыйын-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela: мыйись-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: мыйӧ-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Apr: мыйлань-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Egr: мыйсянь-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+Prl: мыйӧт-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerI: мыйӧдз-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerII: мыйви-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIne: мыйланьын-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEla: мыйланись-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIll: мыйланьӧ-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEgr: мыйланьсянь-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprPrl: мыйланьӧт-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerI: мыйланьӧдз-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerII: мыйланьви-нибудь

    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: мыйез-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: мыйез-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: мыйезлӧн-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Abl: мыйезлісь-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Dat: мыйезлӧ-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ins: мыйезӧн-нибудь 
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: мыйезкӧт-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Car: мыйезтӧг-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cns: мыйезла-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cmpr: мыйезся-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: мыйезын-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: мыйезісь-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: мыйезӧ-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Apr: мыйезлань-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Egr: мыйезсянь-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+Prl: мыйезӧт-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerI: мыйезӧдз-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerII: мыйезви-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIne: мыйезланьын-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEla: мыйезланись-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIll: мыйезланьӧ-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEgr: мыйезланьсянь-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprPrl: мыйезланьӧт-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerI: мыйезланьӧдз-нибудь
    мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerII: мыйезланьви-нибудь

##Pronoun – некин: # Negative Pronoun 'Ei kukaan / Никто'
    некин+Pron+Neg+Sg+Nom: некин
    некин+Pron+Neg+Sg+Acc: некинӧс
    некин+Pron+Neg+Sg+Gen: некинлӧн
    некин+Pron+Neg+Sg+Abl: некинлісь
    некин+Pron+Neg+Sg+Dat: некинлӧ
    некин+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ins: некинӧн 
    некин+Pron+Neg+Sg+Com: некинкӧт
    некин+Pron+Neg+Sg+Car: некинтӧг
    некин+Pron+Neg+Sg+Cns: некинла
    некин+Pron+Neg+Sg+Cmpr: некинся
    некин+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ine: некинын
    некин+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ela: некинісь
    некин+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ill: некинӧ
    некин+Pron+Neg+Sg+Apr: некинлань
    некин+Pron+Neg+Sg+Egr: некинсянь
    некин+Pron+Neg+Sg+Prl: некинӧт
    некин+Pron+Neg+Sg+TerI: некинӧдз
    некин+Pron+Neg+Sg+TerII: некинви
    некин+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprIne: некинланьын
    некин+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprEla: некинланись
    некин+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprIll: некинланьӧ
    некин+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprEgr: некинланьсянь
    некин+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprPrl: некинланьӧт
    некин+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprTerI: некинланьӧдз
    некин+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprTerII: некинланьви
    
Pronoun – нем: # Negative Pronoun 'Ei mikään / Ничто'
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Nom: нем
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Acc: нем
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Gen: немлӧн
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Abl: немлісь
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Dat: немлӧ
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ins: немӧн 
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Com: немкӧт
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Car: немтӧг
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Cns: немла
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Cmpr: немся
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ine: немын
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ela: немись
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ill: немӧ
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Apr: немлань
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Egr: немсянь
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Prl: немӧт
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+TerI: немӧдз
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+TerII: немви
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprIne: немланьын
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprEla: немланись
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprIll: немланьӧ
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprEgr: немланьсянь
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprPrl: немланьӧт
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprTerI: немланьӧдз
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprTerII: немланьви

##Pronoun – кинкӧ: # Indefinite Pronoun 'Joku / кто-то'
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: кинкӧ
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: кинӧскӧ
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: кинлӧнкӧ
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl: кинліськӧ
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Dat: кинлӧкӧ
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ins: кинӧнкӧ 
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: кинкӧткӧ
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Car: кинкӧтӧг
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cns: кинлакӧ
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cmpr: [кинсякӧ, кинкӧся]
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine: кинынкӧ
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela: киніськӧ
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: кинӧкӧ
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Apr: [кинланькӧ, кинкӧлань]
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Egr: [кинсянькӧ, кинкӧсянь]
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Prl: кинӧткӧ
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerI: кинӧдзкӧ
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerII: [кинвикӧ, кинкӧви]
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIne: кинкӧланьын
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEla: кинкӧланись
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIll: кинкӧланьӧ
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEgr: кинкӧланьсянь
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprPrl: кинкӧланьӧт
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerI: кинкӧланьӧдз
    кинкӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerII: кинкӧланьви
